Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205.
(b) “Public funds” means moneys drawn from the State Treasury or any special  or trust
fund of the state government, including any moneys appropriated by the state government
and transferred to any public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, and any other  moneys under
the control of a public official by virtue of office.
(2) A school district may use public funds to place a student of any age  in an out-of-state
child-caring agency only if:
(a) The out-of-state child-caring agency satisfies  the licensing criteria under ORS 418.321
(1)(a) and (2);
(b) The school district has a current contract with the child-caring agency; and
(c) The school district’s contract with the child-caring agency, at a minimum:
(A) Requires the child-caring agency to provide  the school district with a current list of
every entity for which the child-caring  agency is providing placement services at the time
the contract is executed;
(B) Requires the child-caring agency to provide the  school district with the notification
described in ORS 418.321 (3)(b)(B) no later than 15 days after  accepting placement of a child
from a new entity; and
(C) Satisfies the requirements under ORS 418.321 (3)(b)(C) to (O).
(3) The school district shall review the school district’s  contract with an out-of-state
child-caring agency prior to placing a student with the child-caring agency.
(4) The provisions  of this section do not apply to the out-of-state residential placement
of a student in a public education program if  the program meets the standards of an equiv-
alent program in this state and the program is designated as a state school for the deaf or
a state school for the blind.
(5) The Department of Human Services  may charge a school district for the department’s
costs associated with  the licensing, investigation and oversight of an out-of-state child-caring
agency in which the school district places a student under this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act  applies to placements of students in out-of-state
child-caring agencies on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 982 (SB 982-INTRO) Page 1
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 982 (SB 982-INTRO) Page 2